Connecticut, session 2026, HB05221.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section and
2 sections 2 and 3 of this act:
3 (1) "Program review" means an examination of programs
4 administered by state departments and agencies to ascertain whether
5 such programs are effective, continue to serve their intended purposes,
6 are conducted in an efficient and effective manner or require
7 modification or elimination; and
8 (2) "Investigation" means the investigation of any matter which is
9 referred to the Legislative Program Review and Investigations
10 Committee, as provided in section 2 of this act.
11 (b) There is hereby reestablished a Legislative Program Review and
12 Investigations Committee, which shall be a permanent standing
sHB5221 / File No. 160 1

sHB5221 File No. 160
13 committee of the General Assembly, consisting of (1) six members of the
14 Senate, three appointed by the president pro tempore and three
15 appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, and (2) six members of
16 the House of Representatives, three appointed by the speaker of the
17 House of Representatives and three appointed by the minority leader of
18 the House of Representatives. Members shall serve for a term of two
19 years from the date of appointment.
20 (c) The initial appointments of the members shall be made not later
21 than January 6, 2027, and thereafter appointments of the members shall
22 be made at the beginning of each regular session of the General
23 Assembly in the odd-numbered year. The terms of all members
24 appointed to the committee shall end with the termination of each
25 member's term or holding of office, whichever occurs first. Vacancies
26 shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. The
27 committee shall select cochairpersons and such other officers as it may
28 deem necessary from among its membership.
29 (d) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum and all
30 actions of the committee shall require the affirmative vote of a majority
31 of the full committee membership. The cochairpersons and ranking
32 minority members of the joint standing committee of the General
33 Assembly requesting an investigation shall serve as nonvoting, ex-
34 officio members of the Legislative Program Review and Investigations
35 Committee during the course of such investigation.
36 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Legislative Program
37 Review and Investigations Committee shall:
38 (1) Direct its staff and other legislative staff available to the committee
39 to conduct program reviews and investigations to assist the General
40 Assembly in the proper discharge of its duties;
41 (2) Establish policies and procedures regarding the printing,
42 reproduction and distribution of its reports;
43 (3) Review staff reports submitted to the committee and, when
sHB5221 / File No. 160 2

sHB5221 File No. 160
44 necessary, confer with representatives of the state departments and
45 agencies reviewed in order to obtain full and complete information in
46 regard to programs, other activities and operations of the state, and may
47 request and shall be given access to and copies of, by all public officers,
48 departments, agencies and authorities of the state and its political
49 subdivisions, such public records, data and other information and given
50 such assistance as the committee determines it needs to fulfill its duties;
51 (4) Act on staff reports and recommend in its report, or propose, in
52 the form of a raised bill, such legislation as may be necessary to modify
53 current operations and agency practices;
54 (5) Consider and act on requests by members of the General
55 Assembly, legislative committees, elected officials of state government
56 and state department and agency heads for program reviews. The
57 request shall be submitted, in writing, to the Program Review and
58 Investigations Committee and shall state reasons to support the request.
59 The decision of the committee to grant or deny any such request shall
60 be final;
61 (6) Conduct investigations requested by joint resolution of the
62 General Assembly, or, when the General Assembly is not in session, (A)
63 requested by a joint standing committee of the General Assembly or
64 initiated by a majority vote of the Program Review and Investigations
65 Committee and approved by the Joint Committee on Legislative
66 Management, or (B) requested by the Joint Committee on Legislative
67 Management. In the event two or more investigations are requested, the
68 order of priority shall be determined by the Legislative Program Review
69 and Investigations Committee;
70 (7) Retain, within available appropriations, the services of
71 consultants, technical assistants, researchers and other personnel
72 necessary to assist in the conduct of program reviews and
73 investigations;
74 (8) Originate, and report to the General Assembly, any bill it deems
75 necessary concerning a program, department or other matter under
sHB5221 / File No. 160 3

sHB5221 File No. 160
76 review or investigation by the committee, in the same manner as is
77 prescribed by rule for joint standing committees of the General
78 Assembly;
79 (9) Review audit reports after issuance by the Auditors of Public
80 Accounts, evaluate and sponsor new or revised legislation based on
81 audit findings, provide means to determine compliance with audit
82 recommendations and receive facts concerning any unauthorized,
83 illegal, irregular or unsafe handling or expenditures of state funds under
84 the provisions of section 2-90 of the general statutes, as amended by this
85 act;
86 (10) Meet as often as may be necessary, during legislative sessions
87 and during the periods between sessions, to perform its duties and
88 functions; and
89 (11) Report annually to the General Assembly, in accordance with the
90 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, on or before February
91 fifteenth.
92 (b) The committee may, at any time, study any matter within the
93 scope of a completed or partially completed staff report then being
94 conducted or may, at its discretion, study and consider any matter
95 relative to program activities of state departments and agencies.
96 (c) The identity of any public employee providing information to the
97 committee shall not be disclosed. In the course of an investigation, all
98 information, records of interviews, reports, statements, notes,
99 memoranda or other data in the custody of the, or obtained or prepared
100 by, the Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee or its
101 staff shall not be subject to the provisions of section 1-210 of the general
102 statutes until the investigation is completed. Any statutory
103 requirements of confidentiality regarding any records, data and other
104 information submitted under subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this
105 section, including penalties for violating such requirements, shall apply
106 to the committee, its staff and its other authorized representatives in the
107 same manner and to the same extent as such requirements and penalties
sHB5221 / File No. 160 4

sHB5221 File No. 160
108 apply to any public officer, department, agency or authority of the state
109 or its political subdivisions.
110 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) In any instance in which a
111 program review cites inadequate operating or administrative system
112 controls or procedures, inaccuracies, waste, extravagance, unauthorized
113 or unintended activities or programs, or other deficiencies, the
114 department head, or agency head, or the appropriate program officer or
115 official to which the report pertained, shall take the necessary corrective
116 actions and, when the committee deems the action taken to be not
117 suitable, the committee shall report the matter to the General Assembly
118 together with its recommendations.
119 (b) The committee shall report the results of each investigation
120 together with its recommendations for any further action to the General
121 Assembly electronically, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
122 4a of the general statutes.
123 Sec. 4. Section 1-122 of the general statutes is repealed and the
124 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
125 (a) In accordance with the provisions of section 2-90, as amended by
126 this act, the Auditors of Public Accounts shall biennially conduct a
127 compliance audit of each quasi-public agency's activities during the
128 agency's two fiscal years preceding each such audit or contract with a
129 person, firm or corporation for any such audit or audits. Each such audit
130 shall determine whether the quasi-public agency has complied with its
131 regulations concerning affirmative action, personnel practices, the
132 purchase of goods and services, the use of surplus funds and the
133 distribution of loans, grants and other financial assistance. Each audit
134 shall include a review of all or a representative sample of the agency's
135 activities in such areas during the relevant fiscal years. Each quasi-
136 public agency shall pay the cost of conducting such biennial compliance
137 audit of the agency.
138 (b) The Auditors of Public Accounts shall submit each audit report to
139 the Governor [. Each quasi-public agency shall pay the cost of
sHB5221 / File No. 160 5

sHB5221 File No. 160
140 conducting such biennial compliance audit of the agency] and the
141 Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee. Not later
142 than thirty days after receiving copies of an audit report from the
143 Auditors of Public Accounts, the Legislative Program Review and
144 Investigations Committee shall prepare an assessment of whether the
145 audit report complies with the requirements of this section and shall
146 submit the assessment and a copy of the audit report to the joint
147 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
148 matters relating to the quasi-public agency.
149 Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 1-123 of the general statutes is
150 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
151 2026):
152 (a) The board of directors of each quasi-public agency shall annually
153 submit a report to the Governor, [and] the Auditors of Public Accounts
154 and the Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee.
155 Such report shall include, but need not be limited to, the following: (1)
156 A list of all bond issues for the preceding fiscal year, including, for each
157 such issue, the financial advisor and underwriters, whether the issue
158 was competitive, negotiated or privately placed, and the issue's face
159 value and net proceeds; (2) a list of all projects other than those
160 pertaining to owner-occupied housing or student loans receiving
161 financial assistance during the preceding fiscal year, including each
162 project's purpose, location, and the amount of funds provided by the
163 agency; (3) a list of all outside individuals and firms receiving in excess
164 of five thousand dollars in the form of loans, grants or payments for
165 services, except for individuals receiving loans for owner-occupied
166 housing and education; (4) a complete set of financial statements; (5) the
167 cumulative value of all bonds issued, the value of outstanding bonds,
168 and the amount of the state's contingent liability; (6) the affirmative
169 action policy statement, a description of the composition of the agency's
170 work force by race, sex, and occupation and a description of the agency's
171 affirmative action efforts; and (7) a description of planned activities for
172 the current fiscal year. Not later than thirty days after receiving such
173 report from the board of a quasi-public agency, the Legislative Program
sHB5221 / File No. 160 6

sHB5221 File No. 160
174 Review and Investigations Committee shall prepare an assessment of
175 whether the report complies with the requirements of this section and
176 shall submit the assessment and a copy of the report to the joint standing
177 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
178 relating to the quasi-public agency.
179 Sec. 6. Section 2-46 of the general statutes is repealed and the
180 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
181 (a) The president of the Senate, the speaker of the House of
182 Representatives, or a [chairman] chairperson of the whole, or of any
183 committee of either house, of the General Assembly, or either of the
184 chairpersons of the Legislative Program Review and Investigations
185 Committee, shall have the power to compel the attendance and
186 testimony of witnesses by subpoena and capias issued by any of them,
187 require the production of any necessary books, papers or other
188 documents and administer oaths to witnesses in any case under their
189 examination, including any program review or investigation, as defined
190 in section 1 of this act. Any person, summoned as a witness by the
191 authority of either house of the General Assembly or the Legislative
192 Program Review and Investigations Committee to give testimony or to
193 produce books, papers or other documents upon any matter under
194 inquiry before either house, [or] any committee of either house, of the
195 General Assembly, [or] a joint committee of both houses, or by the
196 Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee, who
197 wilfully makes default or, having appeared, refuses to be sworn or to
198 answer any question pertinent to the question under inquiry, shall be
199 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
200 (b) Any individual who is subpoenaed to appear and testify before a
201 committee of the General Assembly or by the Legislative Program
202 Review and Investigations Committee shall have the right to review a
203 copy of the transcript of his or her testimony and a reasonable amount
204 of time to question its accuracy prior to the public release of such
205 transcript or its permanent filing.
206 Sec. 7. Section 2-47 of the general statutes is repealed and the
sHB5221 / File No. 160 7

sHB5221 File No. 160
207 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
208 No witness shall be privileged to refuse to testify to any fact, or to
209 produce any [paper] document, respecting which [he] such witness is
210 examined by either house of the General Assembly, or by any committee
211 of either house or any joint committee of both houses, or by the
212 Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee in any
213 program review or investigation, as defined in section 1 of this act, upon
214 the ground that [his] such witness's testimony to such fact or [his]
215 production of such [paper] document may tend to disgrace [him] such
216 witness or otherwise render [him] such witness infamous.
217 Sec. 8. Subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of section 2-90 of the 2026
218 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
219 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
220 (4) The auditors shall report their findings and recommendations to
221 the Governor, the State Comptroller, [and] the joint standing
222 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
223 relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and
224 government oversight and the Legislative Program Review and
225 Investigations Committee.
226 Sec. 9. Subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 2-90 of the 2026
227 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
228 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
229 (f) (1) If the Auditors of Public Accounts discover, or if it should come
230 to their knowledge, that any unauthorized, illegal, irregular or unsafe
231 handling or expenditure of state funds or quasi-public agency funds or
232 any breakdown in the safekeeping of any resources of the state or a
233 quasi-public agency has occurred or is contemplated, they shall
234 forthwith report the facts to the Governor, the State Comptroller, the
235 clerk of each house of the General Assembly, the joint standing
236 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
237 relating to government oversight, the Legislative Program Review and
238 Investigations Committee and the Attorney General, except that if a
sHB5221 / File No. 160 8

sHB5221 File No. 160
239 matter reported to the Auditors of Public Accounts pursuant to section
240 4-33a is still under investigation by a state or quasi-public agency, the
241 Auditors of Public Accounts may give the agency a reasonable amount
242 of time to conduct such investigation prior to the auditors reporting the
243 matter to said officials and committee.
244 Sec. 10. Subdivision (11) of subsection (g) of section 17a-28 of the 2026
245 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
246 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
247 (11) The Governor, when requested in writing in the course of the
248 Governor's official functions, the Legislative Program Review and
249 Investigations Committee, the joint standing committee of the General
250 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human services, the
251 joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
252 matters relating to the judiciary or the joint standing committee of the
253 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children,
254 when requested in writing by any of such committees in the course of
255 such committee's official functions, and upon a majority vote of such
256 committee, provided no name or other identifying information is
257 disclosed unless such information is essential to the gubernatorial or
258 legislative purpose;
259 Sec. 11. Section 51-51l of the general statutes is repealed and the
260 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
261 (a) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Judicial
262 Review Council shall investigate every written complaint brought
263 before it alleging conduct under section 51-51i, and may initiate an
264 investigation of any judge, administrative law judge or family support
265 magistrate if (1) the council has reason to believe conduct under section
266 51-51i has occurred, or (2) previous complaints indicate a pattern of
267 behavior which would lead to a reasonable belief that conduct under
268 section 51-51i has occurred. The council shall, not later than five days
269 after such initiation of an investigation or receipt of such complaint,
270 notify by registered or certified mail any judge, administrative law
271 judge or family support magistrate under investigation or against
sHB5221 / File No. 160 9

sHB5221 File No. 160
272 whom such complaint is filed. A copy of any such complaint shall
273 accompany such notice. The council shall also notify the complainant of
274 its receipt of such complaint not later than five days thereafter. Any
275 investigation to determine whether or not there is probable cause that
276 conduct under section 51-51i has occurred shall be confidential and any
277 individual called by the council for the purpose of providing
278 information shall not disclose his knowledge of such investigation to a
279 third party prior to the decision of the council on whether probable
280 cause exists, unless the respondent requests that such investigation and
281 disclosure be open, provided information known or obtained
282 independently of any such investigation shall not be confidential. The
283 judge, administrative law judge or family support magistrate shall have
284 the right to appear and be heard and to offer any information which may
285 tend to clear him of probable cause to believe he is guilty of conduct
286 under section 51-51i. The judge, administrative law judge or family
287 support magistrate shall also have the right to be represented by legal
288 counsel and examine and cross-examine witnesses. In conducting its
289 investigation under this subsection, the council may request that a court
290 furnish to the council a record or transcript of court proceedings,
291 including records and transcripts of juvenile matters pursuant to section
292 46b-124 and records and transcripts of cases involving youthful
293 offenders pursuant to section 54-76l, made or prepared by a court
294 reporter, assistant court reporter or monitor and the court shall, upon
295 such request, furnish such record or transcript.
296 (b) The Judicial Review Council shall, not later than three business
297 days after the termination of such investigation, notify the complainant,
298 if any, and the judge, administrative law judge or family support
299 magistrate that the investigation has been terminated and the results
300 thereof. If the council finds that conduct under section 51-51i has not
301 occurred, but the judge, administrative law judge or family support
302 magistrate has acted in a manner which gives the appearance of
303 impropriety or constitutes an unfavorable judicial or magisterial
304 practice, the council may issue an admonishment to the judge,
305 administrative law judge or family support magistrate recommending
306 a change in judicial or magisterial conduct or practice. If an
sHB5221 / File No. 160 10

sHB5221 File No. 160
307 admonishment is issued, the council shall (1) notify the joint standing
308 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
309 relating to the judiciary that an admonishment was issued and provide
310 said committee with the substance of the admonishment, including
311 copies of the complaint file, (2) notify the Chief Court Administrator that
312 an admonishment was issued and provide the Chief Court
313 Administrator with the substance of the admonishment, including
314 copies of the complaint file, and (3) inform the complainant, if any, that
315 an admonishment was issued if the admonishment is the result of
316 misconduct alleged in the complaint. Except as provided in this
317 subsection, the substance of the admonishment shall not be disclosed to
318 any person or organization.
319 (c) If a preliminary investigation indicates that probable cause exists
320 that the judge, administrative law judge or family support magistrate is
321 guilty of conduct under section 51-51i, the council shall hold a hearing
322 concerning the conduct or complaint. All hearings held pursuant to this
323 subsection shall be open. A judge, an administrative law judge or a
324 family support magistrate appearing before such a hearing shall be
325 entitled to counsel, to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses.
326 The council shall make a record of all proceedings pursuant to this
327 subsection. The council shall not later than thirty days after the close of
328 such hearing publish its findings together with a memorandum of its
329 reasons therefor.
330 (d) No complaint against a judge, an administrative law judge or a
331 family support magistrate alleging conduct under section 51-51i shall be
332 brought under this section but within one year from the date the alleged
333 conduct occurred or was discovered or in the exercise of reasonable care
334 should have been discovered, except that no such complaint may be
335 brought more than three years from the date the alleged conduct
336 occurred.
337 (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this
338 section, the council shall disclose any information concerning
339 complaints received by the council on and after January 1, 1978, and
sHB5221 / File No. 160 11

sHB5221 File No. 160
340 investigations and disposition of such complaints to the Legislative
341 Program Review and Investigations Committee when requested by the
342 committee in the course of its functions, in writing, and upon a majority
343 vote of the committee, provided no names or other identifying
344 information shall be disclosed.
345 [(e)] (f) On and after December 19, 1991, any judge, administrative
346 law judge or family support magistrate who has been the subject of an
347 investigation by the Judicial Review Council as a result of a complaint
348 brought before such council may request that such complaint,
349 investigation and the disposition of such complaint be open to public
350 inspection.
351 [(f)] (g) Whenever a complaint against a judge, an administrative law
352 judge or a family support magistrate is pending before the Judicial
353 Review Council within the final year of the term of office of such judge,
354 administrative law judge or family support magistrate, the Judicial
355 Review Council shall designate such complaint as privileged and shall
356 conduct an expedited investigation and hearing so that its duties with
357 respect to such complaint are completed in sufficient time to enable the
358 Judicial Review Council to make its recommendation concerning any
359 such judge to the Judicial Selection Commission and the Governor
360 under section 51-51q in a timely manner.
361 Sec. 12. Subsection (a) of section 2-53m of the general statutes is
362 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
363 2026):
364 (a) The joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
365 cognizance of matters relating to children, in consultation with the
366 Office of Fiscal Analysis, the Office of Legislative Research and the
367 Commission on Women, Children and Seniors, shall maintain an annual
368 report card that evaluates the progress of state policies and programs in
369 promoting the result that all Connecticut children grow up in a stable
370 living environment, safe, healthy and ready to lead successful lives.
371 Progress shall be measured by primary indicators of progress,
372 including, but not limited to, indicators established in the [final] report
sHB5221 / File No. 160 12

sHB5221 File No. 160
373 of the [former] Legislative Program Review and Investigations
374 Committee prepared pursuant to the provisions of section 1 of public
375 act 09-166, of state-wide rates of child abuse, child poverty, low birth
376 weight, third grade reading proficiency, and the annual social health
377 index developed pursuant to section 46a-131a. For each indicator, the
378 data shall also be presented according to ethnicity or race, gender,
379 geography, disability and, where appropriate, age and other relevant
380 characteristics. The joint standing committee of the General Assembly
381 having cognizance of matters relating to children shall prepare the
382 report card on or before January 15, 2018, and annually thereafter. On
383 or before January 15, 2018, and annually thereafter, said committee shall
384 make the report card available to the public on the Internet and on the
385 web site of the General Assembly and shall transmit the report card
386 electronically to (1) members of the joint standing committees of the
387 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
388 appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and human services,
389 (2) the Commissioners of Children and Families, Education and Public
390 Health, (3) the Child Advocate, (4) the Secretary of the Office of Policy
391 and Management, and (5) the Chief Court Administrator.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 1-122
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 1-123(a)
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 2-46
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 2-47
Sec. 8 July 1, 2026 2-90(c)(4)
Sec. 9 July 1, 2026 2-90(f)(1)
Sec. 10 July 1, 2026 17a-28(g)(11)
Sec. 11 July 1, 2026 51-51l
Sec. 12 July 1, 2026 2-53m(a)
sHB5221 / File No. 160 13

sHB5221 File No. 160
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(c), "February 3" was changed to "January 6" to accurately
reflect the legislative session calendar.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5221 / File No. 160 14

sHB5221 File No. 160
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Legislative Mgmt. GF - Cost 1,243,624 1,228,624
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 507,538 507,538
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill re-establishes the Legislative Program Review and
Investigations (PRI) Committee resulting in a salary and other expenses
cost to Legislative Management of $1,243,624 in FY 27 and $1,228,624 in
FY 28, and a corresponding fringe benefit cost of $507,538 in FY 27 and
FY 28.
To meet the requirements of the bill, the PRI committee will have to
hire 12 staff. These staff will include one director, two chief analysts, 8
analysts, and one administrative assistant. The bill requires the PRI
committee to examine state agencies to determine if they are effective,
receive study requests from legislative staff and elected officials, and to
undertake studies at its own initiative.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to state employee wage increases and
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sHB5221 / File No. 160 15

sHB5221 File No. 160
inflation.
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5221
AN ACT REESTABLISHING THE LEGISLATIVE PROGRAM REVIEW
AND INVESTIGATIONS COMMITTEE.